Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.228

Acquisition of control of a converted savings bank—State reciprocity—Definitions.

(1) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(a) "Control" means directly or indirectly alone or in concert with others to own, control, or hold the power to vote twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding stock or voting power of the controlled entity;

(b) "Acquiring depository institution" means a bank or bank holding company, or a converted mutual savings bank or the holding company of a mutual savings bank, or a savings and loan association or the holding company of a savings and loan association, which is chartered in or whose principal office is located in another state, and which seeks to acquire control of a Washington savings bank;

(c) "Acquiring party" means the person acquiring control of a bank through the purchase of stock;

(d) "Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, group acting in concert, association, business trust, or other organization.

(2)(a) It is unlawful for any person to acquire control of a converted savings bank until thirty days after filing with the director a completed application. The application shall be under oath or affirmation, and shall contain substantially all of the following information plus any additional information that the director may prescribe as necessary or appropriate in the particular instance for the protection of bank depositors, borrowers, or shareholders and the public interest:

(i) The identity and banking and business experience of each person by whom or on whose behalf acquisition is to be made;

(ii) The financial and managerial resources and future prospects of each person involved in the acquisition;

(iii) The terms and conditions of any proposed acquisition and the manner in which the acquisition is to be made;

(iv) The source and amount of the funds or other consideration used or to be used in making the acquisition, and a description of the transaction and the names of the parties if any part of these funds or other consideration has been or is to be borrowed or otherwise obtained for the purpose of making the acquisition;

(v) Any plan or proposal which any person making the acquisition may have to liquidate the bank, to sell its assets, to merge it with any other bank, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management;

(vi) The identification of any person employed, retained, or to be compensated by the acquiring party, or by any person on its behalf, who makes solicitations or recommendations to shareholders for the purpose of assisting in the acquisition and a brief description of the terms of the employment, retainer, or arrangement for compensation;

(vii) Copies of all invitations for tenders or advertisements making a tender offer to shareholders for the purchase of their stock to be used in connection with the proposed acquisition; and

(viii) Such additional information as shall be necessary to satisfy the director, in the exercise of the director's discretion, that each such person and associate meets the standards of character, responsibility, and general fitness established for incorporators of a savings bank under RCW 32.08.040.

(b)(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, and subject to (b)(ii) of this subsection, an acquiring depository institution must apply to the director and notify the savings bank to be acquired of an intent to acquire control and the date of the proposed acquisition of control at least thirty days before the date of the acquisition of control.

(ii) Except to the extent of any conflict with applicable federal law, (b)(i) of this subsection does not apply to an acquiring depository institution that is seeking to acquire control of a Washington savings bank unless the home state of the acquiring depository institution permits a Washington converted mutual savings bank, or the Washington-chartered holding company of a mutual savings bank, to acquire control of a controlled entity that is chartered in or whose principal office is located in that home state, unless under terms and conditions that are substantially the same as, or at least as favorable to entry as, those provided under (b)(i) of this subsection.

(c) When a person, other than an individual or corporation, is required to file an application under this section, the director may require that the information required by (a)(i), (ii), (vi), and (viii) of this subsection be given with respect to each person, as defined in subsection (1)(d) of this section, who has an interest in or controls a person filing an application under this subsection.

(d) When a corporation is required to file an application under this section, the director may require that information required by (a)(i), (ii), (vi), and (viii) of this subsection be given for the corporation, each officer and director of the corporation, and each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of twenty-five percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of the corporation.

(e) If any tender offer, request, or invitation for tenders or other agreements to acquire control is proposed to be made by means of a registration statement under the securities act of 1933 (48 Stat. 74, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 77(a)) [15 U.S.C. Sec. 77a], as amended, or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar information under the securities exchange act of 1934 (48 Stat. 881, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 78(a)) [15 U.S.C. Sec. 78a], as amended, the registration statement or application may be filed with the director in lieu of the requirements of this section.

(f) Any acquiring party shall also deliver a copy of any notice or application required by this section to the savings bank proposed to be acquired within two days after such notice or application is filed with the director.

(g) Any acquisition of control in violation of this section shall be ineffective and void.

(h) Any person who willfully or intentionally violates this section or any rule adopted under this section is guilty of a gross misdemeanor pursuant to chapter 9A.20 RCW. Each day's violation shall be considered a separate violation, and any person shall upon conviction be fined not more than one thousand dollars for each day the violation continues.

(3) The director may disapprove the acquisition of a savings bank within thirty days after the filing of a complete application pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section or an extended period not exceeding an additional fifteen days if:

(a) The poor financial condition of any acquiring party might jeopardize the financial stability of the savings bank or might prejudice the interest of depositors, borrowers, or shareholders;

(b) The plan or proposal of the acquiring party to liquidate the savings bank, to sell its assets, to merge it with any person, or to make any other major change in its business or corporate structure or management is not fair and reasonable to its depositors, borrowers, or stockholders or is not in public interest;

(c) The banking and business experience and integrity of any acquiring party who would control the operation of the savings bank indicates that approval would not be in the interest of the savings bank's depositors, borrowers, or shareholders;

(d) The information provided by the application is insufficient for the director to make a determination or there has been insufficient time to verify the information provided and conduct an examination of the qualification of the acquiring party; or

(e) The acquisition would not be in the public interest.

An acquisition may be made prior to expiration of the disapproval period if the director issues written notice of intent not to disapprove the action.

The director shall set forth the basis for disapproval of any proposed acquisition in writing and shall provide a copy of such findings and order to the applicants and to the bank involved. Such findings and order shall not be disclosed to any other party and shall not be subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW unless the findings and/or order are appealed pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW.

Whenever such a change in control occurs, each party to the transaction shall report promptly to the director any changes or replacement of its chief executive officer or of any director occurring in the next twelve-month period, including in its report a statement of the past and current business and professional affiliations of the new chief executive officer or directors.

(4)(a) For a period of ten years following the acquisition of control by any person, neither such acquiring party nor any associate shall receive any loan or the use of any of the funds of, nor purchase, lease, or otherwise receive any property from, nor receive any consideration from the sale, lease, or any other conveyance of property to, any savings bank in which the acquiring party has control except as provided in (b) of this subsection.

(b) Upon application by any acquiring party or associate subject to (a) of this subsection, the director may approve a transaction between a converted savings bank and such acquiring party, person, or associate, upon finding that the terms and conditions of the transaction are at least as advantageous to the savings bank as the savings bank would obtain in a comparable transaction with an unaffiliated person.

(5) Except with the consent of the director, no converted savings bank shall, for the purpose of enabling any person to purchase any or all shares of its capital stock, pledge or otherwise transfer any of its assets as security for a loan to such person or to any associate, or pay any dividend to any such person or associate. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a dividend of stock among shareholders in proportion to their shareholdings. In the event any clause of this section is declared to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, all remaining dependent and independent clauses of this section shall remain in full force and effect.

[ 2005 c 348 s 5; 2005 c 274 s 259; 1994 c 92 s 366; 1989 c 180 s 6; 1985 c 56 s 25.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2005 c 274 s 259 and by 2005 c 348 s 5, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2005 c 348: See note following RCW 30A.38.005.